Oklahoma, session 2025, SB930.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6.1 of Title 80, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Legislature declares that the purpose of this act is to
ensure that law enforcement services are available on United States
military installation property located in this state especially for
the enforcement of juvenile matters including, but not limited to,
delinquency, children in need of care, families in need of services,
and any other matters affecting the safety and welfare of juveniles
within the state. The Legislature further finds, determines, and
declares that this act is necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for the

support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
B. 1. The State of Oklahoma hereby accepts the relinquishment
of exclusive jurisdiction from the United States pursuant to this
section. The State of Oklahoma shall have concurrent jurisdiction
with the United States over the United States military installation
property indicated pursuant to this section for as long as the
United States controls the property.
2. The concurrent jurisdiction over the United States military
installation property pursuant to this section is effective upon the
Governor’s written acceptance of a request filed by the principal
officer, or an authorized representative of the United States who
has supervision or control over the property pursuant to 10 U.S.C.,
Section 2683, of the property where concurrent jurisdiction is
sought, relinquishing exclusive jurisdiction and retaining
concurrent jurisdiction over the property.
3. The Governor shall not accept a request filed pursuant to
this section unless the request contains all of the following
requirements:
a. states the name, position, and legal authority of the
person requesting the cession,
b. unambiguously states the matter for which concurrent
jurisdiction is requested,
c. describes by metes and bounds the United States
military installation property subject to the
concurrent jurisdiction request, and
d. indicates whether the request includes future
contiguous expansions of land acquired for military
purposes.
4. If the Governor accepts a request pursuant to this section,
the Governor’s written acceptance shall state the elements of the
request that are accepted.
ENR. S. B. NO. 930 Page 2

5. If the Governor accepts a request pursuant to this section,
the Governor shall file the following documents with the Secretary
of State and submit copies of all of the following documents to the
person who requested concurrent jurisdiction:
a. the United States’ request for concurrent
jurisdiction,
b. the Governor’s written acceptance of concurrent
jurisdiction, and
c. a description by metes and bounds of the United States
military installation property subject to the
concurrent jurisdiction.
C. Upon request by the United States through an authorized
representative, the governor may execute appropriate documents to
accomplish the cession granted by this section.
D. The state shall not incur or assume any liability as a
result of accepting concurrent jurisdiction pursuant to this
section.
E. Upon the establishment of the concurrent jurisdiction
pursuant to this section, a state agency or political subdivision
may, at the sole discretion of the state agency or political
subdivision, enter into a reciprocal agreement with a United States
agency to designate duties related to the concurrent jurisdiction
between the parties. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
create any affirmative obligation on the part of a state agency or
political subdivision or to require a state agency, local
government, or district to enter into any reciprocal agreement
related to the investigation or prosecution of any case, incident,
or allegation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 930 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 13th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 930 Page 4